Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1365
State highway system; development; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that the highways of the state are of the utmost importance to future development within the state and that the following actions are necessary for such development: (1) The accelerated completion of all improvement and expansion projects on the Nebraska segments of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways; (2) the accelerated completion of improvement projects on state highways with geometric and capacity deficiencies; (3) the resurfacing of highways to protect pavement integrity; (4) the accelerated completion of the expressway system, as such system was designated on January 1, 2016, prior to June 30, 2033; and (5) the general upgrading of the state highway system concerning driving surfaces and surfaced shoulders.

Laws 1988, LB 632, § 23;

Laws 2016, LB960, § 26.